Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-367.01
Sexual exploitation,
defined.

Sexual exploitation includes, but is not
limited to, a
violation of section 28-311.08 and causing, allowing, permitting,
inflicting, or encouraging a vulnerable adult to engage in voyeurism, in exhibitionism,
in prostitution, or in the lewd, obscene, or pornographic photographing, filming,
or depiction of the vulnerable adult.

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB998, § 3.